Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.36001

Tribal actions—Federal jurisdiction.

The state consents to the jurisdiction of the federal courts in actions brought by a tribe pursuant to the Indian gaming regulatory act of 1988 or seeking enforcement of a state/tribal compact adopted under the Indian gaming regulatory act, conditioned upon the tribe entering into such a compact and providing similar consent. This limited waiver of sovereign immunity shall not extend to actions other than those expressly set forth herein.

[ 2007 c 321 s 1; 2001 c 236 s 1.]